src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: fjøður
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: fjøður
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: fjøður
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: fjaðrar
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: fjaðrar
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: [fjøðrum, fjaðrum]
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: fjaðra
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: fjøðurin
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: fjøðurina
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: fjøðurini
    fjøður+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: fjaðrarinnar
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: fjaðrarnar
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [fjøðrunum, fjaðrunum]
    fjøður+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: fjaðranna
